Utah statutes.
11-25-15.   Proceedings for enforcement of rights of bondholders and
trustees.
Any holder of bonds issued under the provisions of this part or any of the
coupons appertaining thereto, and the trustee or trustees appointed pursuant
to any resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds, except to the extent
the rights thereof may be restricted by the resolution authorizing the
issuance of the bonds, may, either at law or in equity, by suit, action,
mandamus, or other proceedings, protect or enforce any and all rights
specified in the laws of the state or in the resolution, and may enforce and
compel the performance of all duties required by this part or by such
resolution to be performed by the agency or by any officer, employee, or agent
thereof, including the fixing, charging, and collecting of rates, fees,
interest and charges authorized and required by the provisions of the
resolution to be fixed, established, and collected.
